Maine, session 132, LD1455.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2421-A, sub-§19, as enacted by PL 2023, c.679, Pt. A, §3, is
amended by enacting at the end a new first blocked paragraph to read:
Notwithstanding paragraphs A to C, "disqualifying drug offense" includes a conviction
related to the cultivation or distribution of cannabis that is not authorized in this chapter, in
the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter or in Title 28-B or in the rules adopted pursuant
to Title 28-B and that occurred on or after October 1, 2025.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §2423-F, sub-§8, ¶A, as repealed and replaced by PL 2019, c.
331, §17 and amended by PL 2021, c. 669, §5, is further amended by enacting at the end a
new first blocked paragraph to read:
The department may not register and issue a registration certificate to a facility or a
person authorized to engage in cannabis extraction if the physical location of the
facility or person is under investigation by state or federal law enforcement officers for
the illegal cultivation or distribution of cannabis or was used by a person convicted of
illegal cultivation or distribution of cannabis for those purposes.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §2425-A, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 452, §12, is amended
to read:
2. Required registration. A caregiver, other than a caregiver operating under section
2423‑A, subsection 3, paragraph C, and an officer or director or assistant of a dispensary
or a caregiver, other than a caregiver operating under section 2423‑A, subsection 3,
paragraph C, shall obtain a registry identification card in accordance with subsections 2-A,
3, 4 and 5. A long-term care facility designated by a qualifying patient pursuant to section
2423‑A, subsection 1, paragraph F‑1, subparagraph (2) and a dispensary shall obtain a
registration certificate in accordance with subsections 2-A, 6, 7 and 8.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §2425-A, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Registration prohibited. The department may not register and issue a registry
identification card or a registration certificate to a person if the person is registering to
conduct activity under this chapter at a physical location that is under an investigation by
state or federal law enforcement officers for the illegal cultivation or distribution of
cannabis or that was used by a person convicted of illegal cultivation or distribution of
cannabis for those purposes.
Sec. 5. 28-B MRSA §102-A, sub-§28, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §3, is
amended by enacting at the end a new first blocked paragraph to read:
Notwithstanding paragraphs A and B, "disqualifying drug offense" includes a conviction
related to the cultivation or distribution of cannabis that is not authorized in this Title, in
the rules adopted pursuant to this Title or in the Maine Medical Use of Cannabis Act or in
the rules adopted pursuant to that Act and that occurred on or after October 1, 2025.
Sec. 6. 28-B MRSA §202, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Not under investigation; premises. The applicant may not propose to operate
licensed premises at a physical location that is under investigation by state or federal law
enforcement officers for the illegal cultivation or distribution of cannabis or that was used
by a person convicted of illegal cultivation or distribution of cannabis for those purposes.
Page 1 - 132LR1019(01)